Louisiana, session 2026, HB221.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The new bridge to be built across the Mississippi River, connecting
Louisiana Highway 1 to Louisiana Highway 30 shall be known and is hereby designated as
the "President Donald J. Trump Expressway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation once
the bridge is constructed, provided local or private monies are received by the department
equal to the department's actual cost for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and
installation of the signage, not to exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective if and when the federal government
provides a substantial amount of funding for construction of the bridge, but only if such
funding is provided prior to noon on January 20, 2029.
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-707 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 221